apertium-uzb.uzb.twol
Alphabet
 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W Y Z X
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w y z x
 %0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9
 %{K%}:k %{Q%}:q
 %{G%}:g %{G%}:k %{G%}:q
 %{D%}:d %{D%}:t
 %{l%}:l %{L%}:l %{L%}:n %{M%}:m %{N%}:n ! Cns
 %{I%}:i %{u%}:i ! Vow
 %{A%}:a 
 %{E%}:a %{E%}:y
 %{i%}:0 %{i%}:i
 %{ʻ%}:0 %{ʻ%}:ʻ

%{s%}:s %{s%}:0

%{S%}:s %{K%}:k %{n%}:n 

%{a%}:a
%{й%}:y %{й%}:0


 %[%+p3pl%]:0  %[%-coop%]:0

ʻ 

%>:0 %  ; 

Sets

Vow =     A E I O U 
          a e i o u 
          %{A%} %{I%} %{E%} %{u%} ;
          
Cons = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v z x y ʻ
       B C D F G H J K L M N P Q R S T V Z X Y
       %{D%} %{K%} %{Q%} %{G%} %{N%} %{L%} %{M%} %{S%} %{n%} ; ! %- ;

Rules

"{D} as t after (some?) voiceless cons"
%{D%}:t <=> [ :p ]/[ :0 | %>: ]* _ ;

"{s} is deleted following a consonant"
%{s%}:0 <=> :Cons %>:/[ :0 | :ʻ ]* _ ;

"{E} becomes y when following a vowel"
%{E%}:y <=> :Vow %>: _ ;

!"{K} becomes g when it is before a vowel"
!%{K%}:g <=>  _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;

!"{Q} becomes gʻ when it is before a vowel"
!%{q%}:gʻ <=>  _ %>: (:0) :Vow ;

"{i} is null after a vowel"
%{i%}:0 <=> :Vow [ :0 - %{й%}: ]* _ ;
            :Vow (%{й%}:0) %>: _ \[ :s :h ] ;

"{a} is null after a vowel"
%{a%}:0 <=> :Vow :0* _ ;

"{й}:y only before -ish"
%{й%}:y <=> _ %>: %{i%}: :s :h ;

"{G} is k/q after {k/q}>"
%{G%}:Cy <=> :Cx %>:/[ :0 - %>: ]* _ ;
         where
             Cx in ( k q )
             Cy in ( k q )
         matched ;

"{G} is g everywhere but after k/q"
%{G%}:g <=> _ ;
        except
            [ :k | :q ] %>:/[ :0 - %>: ]* _ ;

"intervocalic stem-final k & q voice before vowels, but only in N/Adj forms"
Cx:g <=> :Vow _ %>: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* %{ʻ%}: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* :Vow ;
     where Cx in ( k q ) ;

!"intervocalic stem-final q voices before vowels, but only in N/Adj forms"
!q:g <=> :Vow _ %>: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* %{ʻ%}: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* :Vow ;

"{ʻ}:ʻ only when q:gʻ"
%{ʻ%}:ʻ <=> :Vow q: %>: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* _ [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* :Vow ;
!%{ʻ%}:ʻ <=> _ ;
!        except
!            :Vow q: %>: [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* _ [ :0 - [ %>: | %{ʻ%}: ] ]* :Vow ;

!"Voicing assimilation of front G"
!%{G%}:k <=> :k %>: _ ; ! "from "Учебник узбекского языка для стран СНГ" there only -k and -g endings transfer to k" !  should be only for k/q final words for now - will update if I find contrary examples.

!"Voicing assimilation of front G"
!%{G%}:q <=> :q %>: _ ; ! "from "Учебник узбекского языка для стран СНГ" there only -k and -g endings transfer to k" !  should be only for k/qfinal words for now - will update if I find contrary examples.

!"{u} deletion"
!%{u%}:0 <=> _ Cons: %>: (:0) :Vow ;

!"{a} is null after a vowel"
!%{a%}:0 <=> :Vow :0* _ ;

"{L} as n in passive"
%{L%}:n <=> [ :l :Vow ]/:0* _ ;
